Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 2 Administration by the State Agency Generally

47-18-20.
Duty to make and publish rules and regulations.

The state agency shall publish such policies and procedures, not inconsistent with this chapter, as it finds necessary or appropriate to the efficient administration of the functions with which it is charged under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 2/HB 997.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “publish such policies and procedures” for “make and publish such rules and regulations” near the beginning.

47-18-21.
Expenses and administrative costs incurred under this chapter.

All expenses incurred by the state agency relative to and incidental to the administration of this chapter, including, without limitation, the creation of a full-time position for such purpose, shall be paid from funds appropriated to the state agency.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 8; Code 1981, §

47-18-22

; Code 1981, §

47-18-21

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 2/HB 997.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, redesignated former Code Section 47-18-22 as present Code Section 47-18-21, and substituted the present provisions for the former provisions which read: “All expenses of the state agency relative to and incidental to the administration of this chapter shall be paid from funds paid into the state agency by participating subdivisions for such purpose and as shall be provided for by the rules and regulations of such state agency.”.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the duty to study and report on the problem of old-age, survivors, and disability insurance protection for employees of the state and its political subdivisions. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 7.

47-18-22.
Redesignated.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, redesignated former Code Section 47-18-22 as present Code Section 47-18-21.